Hawaii statutes.
§353D-3 Offender family service center
program; established. (a) There is established in the department an
offender family service center program near the Oahu community correctional
center.

(b) The department may contract with a private
nonprofit agency pursuant to chapter 42D to implement this chapter. [L 1987, c
251, pt of §1; am L 1991, c 335, §13]

Note

The amendment made by L 1997, c 190, §6 is not included in
this section.

Chapter 42D referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next